Maryland, session 2025, HB1538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1538*

HOUSE BILL 1538
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
SUBTITLE 12. MATERNAL HEALTH MONITORING PILOT PROGRAM.
15–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS AN OBSTETRICIAN OR
MATERNAL–FETAL MEDICINE PHYSICIAN WHO IS:
(1) LICENSED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) CARING FOR A PARTICIPANT.
(C) “MATERNAL DIABETES” MEANS DIABETES THAT:
(1) DEVELOPED PRIOR TO PREGNANCY AND CONTINUES DURING
PREGNANCY; OR
(2) DEVELOPS DURING PREGNANCY.
(D) “MATERNAL HYPERTENSION” MEANS HYPERTENSION THAT:
(1) DEVELOPED PRIOR TO PREGNANCY AND CONTINUES DURING
PREGNANCY; OR
(2) DEVELOPS DURING PREGNANCY.
(E) “PARTICIPANT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 15–1202 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND IS PARTICIPATING IN THE
PILOT PROGRAM.
(F) “PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION” MEANS THE
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SELECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO ADMINISTER
THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(G) “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE MATERNAL HEALTH MONITORING
PILOT PROGRAM.
(H) “REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING” MEANS THE USE OF TECHNOLOGY
THAT:

HOUSE BILL 1538 3
(1) COLLECTS HEALTH DATA FROM AN ELIGIBLE PARTICIPANT AND
ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMITS THE DATA SECURELY THROUGH CELLULAR
NETWORKS;
(2) IS AUTHORIZED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION; AND
(3) MONITORS HEALTH DATA, INCLUDING:
(I) BLOOD PRESSURE;
(II) WEIGHT;
(III) BLOOD GLUCOSE LEVELS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER PHYSIOLOGICAL HEALTH DATA DETERMINED
NECESSARY BY THE PARTICIPANT’S HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.
(I) “TECHNOLOGY VENDOR” MEANS THE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY
SELECTED AND CONTRACTED WITH BY THE PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION.
15–1202.
(A) THERE IS A MATERNAL HEALTH MONITORING PILOT PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM IS TO SUPPORT PREGNANT AND
POSTPARTUM PROGRAM RECIPIENTS WHO HAVE A HIGHER RISK OF PREGNANCY
COMPLICATIONS BECAUSE OF MATERNAL HYPERTENSION OR MATERNAL DIABETES.
(C) A PROGRAM RECIPIENT IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE PILOT PROGRAM IF THE
PROGRAM RECIPIENT IS:
(1) PREGNANT;
(2) AN ENROLLEE IN THE PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION; AND
(3) DIAGNOSED WITH MATERNAL HYPERTENSION OR MATERNAL
DIABETES.

HOUSE BILL 1538
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) SELECT A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION TO ADMINISTER
THE PILOT PROGRAM IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, PAY A
$2,000 FEE PER PARTICIPANT TO THE PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION TO ADMINISTER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(2) THE TOTAL AMOUNT PAID TO THE PARTICIPATING MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT
EXCEED $600,000.
(E) THE PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SHALL:
(1) CONTRACT WITH A TECHNOLOGY VENDOR TO OFFER REMOTE
PATIENT MONITORING SERVICES TO PARTICIPANTS;
(2) REIMBURSE THE TECHNOLOGY VENDOR FOR THE COST OF
PROVIDING REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING SERVICES AND DEVICES; AND
(3) ENSURE PARTICIPANTS HAVE ACCESS TO REMOTE MONITORING
SERVICES UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(F) THE TECHNOLOGY VENDOR SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE PREPROGRAMMED TECHNOLOGY SPECIFIC TO EACH
PARTICIPANT; AND
(2) ENSURE THAT:
(I) REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING OCCURS DURING THE
PARTICIPANT’S SECOND AND THIRD TRIMESTERS AND FOR UP TO 3 MONTHS
POSTPARTUM;
(II) REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING DEVICES ARE DELIVERED
TO EACH PARTICIPANT; AND
(III) EACH PARTICIPANT IS TRAINED ON HOW TO USE THE
REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING DEVICE.
(G) (1) THE TECHNOLOGY VENDOR SHALL EMPLOY A NURSING TEAM
THAT INCLUDES:

HOUSE BILL 1538 5
(I) A NURSE LICENSED IN THE STATE;
(II) A DIETITIAN–NUTRITIONIST LICENSED IN THE STATE; AND
(III) A CERTIFIED DIABETES CARE AND EDUCATION SPECIALIST.
(2) THE NURSING TEAM EMPLOYED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL SUPPORT EACH PARTICIPANT BY:
(I) MONITORING AND REVIEWING THE PARTICIPANT’S HEALTH
DATA;
(II) ESTABLISHING, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE MANAGED
CARE ORGANIZATION, A PROCESS TO BE COMPLIED WITH IF THE PARTICIPANT’S
REMOTE PATIENT MONITORING READINGS AND SYMPTOMS REQUIRE IMMEDIATE
ATTENTION FROM THE PARTICIPANT’S HEALTH CARE PROVIDER; AND
(III) PROVIDING HEALTH COACHING TO EACH PARTICIPANT
REGARDING:
1. CONDITION MANAGEMENT;
2. HEALTH BEHAVIOR MODIFICATION; AND
3. NUTRITION.
(H) THE TECHNOLOGY VENDOR SHALL ASSIGN A PROGRAM MANAGER TO:
(1) SUPPORT IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PILOT PROGRAM; AND
(2) COORDINATE EFFORTS BETWEEN THE DEPARTMENT AND THE
PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ENSURE THAT PARTICIPATION IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM REPRESENTS THE GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF THE STATE AND INCLUDES
A STATISTICALLY RELEVANT NUMBER OF PARTICIPANTS.
(J) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $600,000 TO THE PROGRAM.
(K) THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL OPERATE DURING FISCAL YEARS 2026
AND 2027.

HOUSE BILL 1538
(L) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONJUNCTION
WITH THE PARTICIPATING MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION AND THE TECHNOLOGY
VENDOR, SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS RELATED TO THE
PILOT PROGRAM TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.